Utah statutes.
59-15-105.   Reports -- Credit -- Records.
(1)  Every brewer, wholesaler, or distributor manufacturing or importing beer
for sale, use, or distribution in the state shall, before the last day of each
month, file with the commission a return for the preceding calendar month
showing the total number of barrels of beer or fractional parts of barrels
manufactured or imported during the preceding monthly period.  The total
barrels of beer manufactured or imported with deductions made for the number
of barrels exempt under this chapter shall be reported. The report shall also
contain other information required by the commission, and the person shall, at
the time of filing the report, pay to the commission the amount of tax due at
the rate fixed in accordance with this chapter.  Credit is allowed for
spoilage, and for taxes already paid on beer, as provided under this chapter.
(2)  For purposes of this chapter, beer is considered manufactured when it is
placed in containers for use, sale, or distribution, and beer is considered
imported when it is first received in the state for use, sale, or
distribution.
(3)  It is the duty of every person manufacturing or importing beer for sale
in this state to keep and preserve adequate records for a period of three
years showing the amount of beer sold.  These records are open to inspection
by the commission, or its authorized representative during reasonable business
hours.
